Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 31 Affordable Clean Energy Security Act

39-31-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares:

The state and New England face significant short- and long-term energy system challenges that may undermine the reliable operation of the bulk electric system and spur unsustainable levels of price volatility, and that these challenges may have a substantial impact on energy affordability for ratepayers and undermine the economic competitiveness of our state by serving as a detriment to capital investment and job growth; and

Planned retirements of fossil-fuel, nuclear, and other electric generators, along with lack of new interstate natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity into the region, may exacerbate these conditions; and

Rhode Island benefits from a holistic energy strategy that pursues both local investment in clean-energy resources, such as energy efficiency and renewable distributed generation, and regional investment in energy infrastructure projects that strengthen system reliability and diversify our supply portfolio. The combination of these strategies advances our economic development interests and environmental quality; and

Rhode Island is committed to the increased use of no- and low-carbon energy resources that diversify our energy supply portfolio, provide affordable energy to consumers, and strengthen our shared quality of life and environment, and new energy infrastructure investments may help facilitate the development and interconnection of these resources; and

Rhode Island is part of an integrated, regional energy system and addressing these challenges, while meeting state policy goals, requires a coordinated, multistate approach built upon collaboration and utilizing appropriate expertise and stakeholder processes of regional entities including, but not limited to, the New England States Committee on Electricity, ISO-New England, Inc., and the New England Power Pool that takes into account affordability, energy security, reliability, fuel diversity, and environmental sustainability.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 477, § 1.

39-31-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to:

Secure the future of the Rhode Island and New England economies, and their shared environment, by making state and/or coordinated, cost-effective, strategic investments in energy resources and infrastructure such that the New England states improve energy system reliability and security; enhance economic competitiveness by reducing energy costs to attract new investment and job growth opportunities; and protect the quality of life and environment for all residents and businesses;

Utilize state and/or coordinated competitive processes, in collaboration with other New England states and their instrumentalities, to advance strategic investment in energy infrastructure and energy resources, provided that the total energy security, reliability, environmental, and economic benefits to the state of Rhode Island and its ratepayers exceed the costs of the projects, and ensure that the benefits and costs of the energy infrastructure investments are shared appropriately among the New England States; and

Encourage an approach to energy policy that advances the objectives of achieving a reliable, clean-energy future that is consistent with meeting greenhouse gas reduction goals as established by chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 act on climate”) at reasonable cost to ratepayers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 477, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 373, § 1.

39-31-3.
Commercially reasonable defined.

When used in this chapter, “commercially reasonable” means terms and pricing that are reasonably consistent with what an experienced power market analyst would expect to see in transactions involving regional energy resources and regional energy infrastructure. Commercially reasonable shall include having a credible project operation date, as determined by the commission, but a project need not have completed the requisite permitting process to be considered commercially reasonable. Commercially reasonable shall require a determination by the commission that the benefits to Rhode Island exceed the cost of the project. The commission shall determine, based on the preponderance of the evidence, that the total energy security, reliability, environmental, and economic benefits to the state of Rhode Island and its ratepayers exceed the costs of such projects. If there is a dispute about whether any terms or pricing are commercially reasonable, the commission shall make the final determination after evidentiary hearings.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 477, § 1.

39-31-4.
Regional energy planning.

Consistent with the purposes of this chapter, and utilizing regional stakeholder processes where appropriate, the office of energy resources, in consultation and coordination with the division of public utilities and carriers and the public utility company that provides electric distribution as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

as well as natural gas as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(17)

, is authorized to:

Participate in the development and issuance of state, regional, or multistate competitive solicitation(s) for the development and construction of regional electric-transmission projects that would allow for the reliable transmission of large- or small-scale domestic or international hydroelectric power to New England load centers that will benefit the state of Rhode Island and its ratepayers, and such solicitations may be issued by the New England States Committee on Electricity or the electric or natural gas distribution company to further the purposes of this chapter;

Participate in the development and issuance of state, regional, or multistate competitive solicitation(s) for the development and construction of regional electric-transmission projects that would allow for the reliable transmission of eligible renewable energy resources, including offshore wind, as defined by §

39-26-5(a)

, to New England load centers that will benefit the state of Rhode Island and its ratepayers, and the solicitations may be issued by the New England States Committee on Electricity or the electric or natural gas distribution company to further the purposes of this chapter; and

Participate in the development and issuance of regional or multistate competitive solicitation(s) for the development and construction of regional natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity that will benefit the state of Rhode Island and its ratepayers by strengthening energy system reliability and security and, in doing so, potentially mitigate energy price volatility that threatens the economic vitality and competitiveness of Rhode Island residents and businesses. The solicitations may be issued by the New England States Committee on Electricity or the electric or natural gas distribution company to further the purposes of this chapter; and the solicitations may request proposals that are priced in increments to allow for the evaluation of project costs and benefits associated with adding various levels of additional, natural gas pipeline capacity into New England and assist with the optimization of energy system reliability, economic, and other benefits consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

As part of any such state, regional, or multistate competitive solicitation processes conducted pursuant to this chapter, the office of energy resources shall work jointly with the division of public utilities and carriers, and with the electric distribution company as appropriate, to identify incremental, natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity and/or electric-transmission projects that optimize energy reliability, economic, environmental, and ratepayer impacts for Rhode Island, consistent with the legislative findings and purpose of this chapter. The office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers shall be authorized to utilize expert consultants, as needed, to assist in any state, regional, multistate, or state-level determination related to the procurement activities identified in §

39-31-5

.

Prior to any binding commitments being made by any agencies of the state, the electric distribution company, or any other entity that would result in costs being incurred directly, or indirectly, by Rhode Island electric and/or gas consumers through distribution or commodity rates, the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers shall jointly file any energy infrastructure project recommendation(s) with the public utilities commission and may make such filing jointly with the electric or natural gas distribution company as appropriate. The public utilities commission shall consider any such recommendation(s) as specified under §

39-31-7

.

A copy of the filing made under subsection (b) of this section shall be provided to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house, the department of environmental management, and the commerce corporation.

The electric distribution company shall be provided with a copy of any filing made under this section at least ten (10) business days in advance of its filing with the public utilities commission and the electric or gas distribution utility may file separate comments when the filing is made.

As part of any office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers filing made pursuant to this chapter, the agencies shall identify the expected energy reliability, energy security, and ratepayer impacts that are expected to result from commitments being made in connection with the proposed project(s).

The office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers reserve the right to determine that energy infrastructure projects submitted in any state, regional, or multistate competitive solicitation process are not in Rhode Island’s energy reliability, energy security, and/or ratepayer interests, and shall make such findings available to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house. The electric or gas distribution utility may attach a separate opinion to those findings, at its election.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 477, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 26; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 24; P.L. 2022, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 373, § 1.

39-31-5.
State and regional energy procurement.

Consistent with the purposes of this chapter, the public utility company that provides electric distribution as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

, as well as natural gas as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(17)

, in consultation with the office of energy resources and the division of public utilities and carriers is authorized to voluntarily participate in state, multistate, or regional efforts to:

Procure domestic or international large- or small-scale hydroelectric power and eligible renewable energy resources, including wind, as defined by §

39-26-5(a)

, on behalf of electric ratepayers; provided, however, that large-scale hydroelectric power shall not be eligible under the renewable energy standard established by chapter 26 of this title;

Procure incremental, natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity into New England to help strengthen energy system reliability and facilitate the economic interests of the state and its ratepayers;

Support the development and filing of necessary tariffs and other appropriate cost-recovery mechanisms, as proposed by the office of energy resources or the division of public utilities and carriers, that allocate the costs of new, electric-transmission and natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity projects selected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to ratepayers, such that costs are shared among participating states in an equitable manner; and

To the extent that the public utility company that provides electric distribution as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

, as well as natural gas as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(17)

, pursues the objectives identified above, the public utility company shall utilize all appropriate, competitive processes, and maintain compliance with applicable federal and state siting laws.

Any procurement authorized under this section shall be commercially reasonable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 477, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 24; P.L. 2022, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 373, § 1.

39-31-6.
Utility filings with the public utilities commission.

Pursuant to the procurement activities in §

39-31-5

or §

39-31-10

, the public utility company that provides electric distribution as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

, as well the public utilities that distribute natural gas as provided by §

39-1-2(a)(20)

, are authorized to voluntarily file proposals with the public utilities commission for approval to implement these policies and achieve the purposes of this chapter. The company’s proposals may include, but are not limited to the, following authorizations:

Subject to review and approval of the commission, to enter into long-term contracts through appropriate competitive processes for large- or small-scale hydroelectric power and/or renewable energy resources that are eligible under the renewable energy standard established by chapter 26 of this title; provided, however, that large-scale hydroelectric power shall not be eligible under the renewable energy standard established by chapter 26 of this title, and provided that:

The electric distribution company may, subject to review and approval of the commission, select a reasonable, open, and competitive method of soliciting proposals from renewable energy developers, including domestic or international large- or small-scale hydroelectric power, that may include public solicitations and individual negotiations.

The solicitation process shall permit a reasonable amount of negotiating discretion for the parties to engage in arms-length negotiations over final contract terms.

Each long-term contract entered into pursuant to this section shall contain a condition that it shall not be effective without commission review and approval.

The electric distribution company shall file the contract(s) or unsigned contract(s) pursuant to §

39-31-10

(c), along with a justification for its decision, within a reasonable time after it has executed the contract following a solicitation or negotiation.

Subject to review and approval of the public utilities commission, to enter into long-term contracts for natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity that are commercially reasonable and advance the purposes of this chapter at levels beyond those commitments necessary to serve local gas distribution customers, and may do so either directly, or in coordination with, other New England states and instrumentalities; utilities; generators; or other appropriate contracting parties.

The commission shall accept public comment on any contracts filed by the distribution utility, as authorized under this section, for a period no less than thirty (30) days.

During this public comment period, the contracts shall be reviewed by the following state agencies, which shall provide advisory opinions to the public utilities commission on the topics specified, and the public utilities commission shall give due consideration to the advisory opinions filed:

The department of environmental management (DEM) shall provide an advisory opinion on the expected greenhouse gas emissions and statewide environmental impacts resulting from the proposed contract(s), including a determination as to whether the proposed project(s) advance the goals of chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 Act on Climate”).

The commerce corporation shall provide an advisory opinion on the expected statewide economic impacts resulting from the proposed contract(s).

The office of energy resources shall provide an advisory opinion on the expected energy security, reliability, environmental, and economic impacts resulting from the contract(s).

The commission shall notify the aforementioned agencies upon the filing of any contract filed by the distribution utility pursuant to this chapter, and notify them of any related hearings and/or proceedings.

Advisory opinions issued by agencies designated under subsection (a)(1)(vi)(A) of this section shall not be considered as final decisions of the agencies making the opinions, and shall not be subject to judicial review under §

42-35-15

, or any other provision of the general laws.

The commission shall approve the contract(s) if it determines that:

The contract is commercially reasonable;

The requirements for the solicitation have been met;

The contract is consistent with achievement of the state’s greenhouse gas reduction targets as specified in chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 Act on Climate”); and

The contract is consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

Participate in a multistate or regional sharing of costs through the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission-approved tariffs for the costs of electric transmission and natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure projects pursued under this chapter.

The commission shall hold evidentiary hearings and public hearings to review any contract filing that may be made pursuant to this section and issue a written order approving or rejecting the contract within one hundred twenty (120) days of the filing; in rejecting a contract, the commission may advise the parties of the reason for the contract being rejected and provide an option for the parties to attempt to address the reasons for rejection in a revised contract within a specified period not to exceed ninety (90) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 477, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 373, § 1.

39-31-7.
Duties of the commission.

The commission shall approve any proposals made by the electric and gas distribution company that are commercially reasonable and advance the purposes of this chapter. The commission’s authority shall include, without limitation, the authority to:

Approve long-term contracts entered into pursuant to the goals and provisions of this chapter for large- or small-scale hydroelectric power and renewable energy resources that are eligible under the renewable energy standard established by chapter 26 of this title; provided, however, that large-scale hydroelectric power shall not be eligible under the renewable energy standard established by chapter 26 of this title;

Approve long-term contracts for natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity consistent with the purposes of this chapter;

Approve rate-recovery mechanisms proposed by the electric and gas distribution companies relating to costs incurred under this chapter by the electric and gas distribution company that facilitate the multistate or regional sharing of costs necessary to implement electric transmission and natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure projects pursued under this chapter, including any costs incurred through the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approved tariffs related to such multistate or regional energy infrastructure procurements;

Address any proposed changes to standard-offer procurements, standard-offer pricing, and retail-choice rules;

Provide for the recovery of reasonable net costs from all distribution customers incurred by the electric and gas distribution company in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter that may include, but are not limited to, costs to solicit, evaluate, and seek approval of such contracts as well as net costs incurred under any contracts approved by the commission under this section and costs associated with the management of incremental capacity resulting from interstate gas-pipeline-expansion projects pursued pursuant to this chapter and costs associated with investments in local gas-distribution-network assets necessary to implement such interstate gas-pipeline-expansion projects;

Nothing herein is intended to prohibit the commission from allowing the electric distribution company to use the energy, capacity, and other attributes purchased for resale to customers and approve tariffs that charge those customers for the energy, capacity, and other attributes from the resale to those customers; and/or to use the NE-GIS certificates for purposes of meeting the obligations set forth in chapter 26 of this title (“renewable energy standard”);

Approve cost allocation proposals filed by the gas distribution company and/or the electric distribution company that appropriately allocate offshore wind costs incurred under §

39-31-10

, natural gas infrastructure and capacity costs incurred under §

39-31-6

between electric and gas distribution customers of the electric and gas distribution company in a manner proportional to the energy benefits accrued by Rhode Island’s gas and electric customers from making such investments. In making its determination, the commission shall consider projected reductions in regional, wholesale electric prices as a benefit that accrues to electric ratepayers. The allocation of costs shall include all distribution customers, regardless from whom they are purchasing their commodity service; and

Approve any other proposed regulatory or ratemaking changes that reasonably advance the goals set forth herein.

The grant of authorizations under this chapter shall not be construed as creating a mandate or obligation on the part of the electric and gas distribution company to enter into any contracts or file any proposals pursuant to this chapter.

The public utilities commission shall docket any proposals made by the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers pursuant to §

39-31-4

. Docket materials shall be posted and maintained on the commission’s website. The commission shall conduct proceedings, as provided below, solely for the purpose of determining whether the proposed infrastructure projects, if implemented, are in the public interest and no commitments shall be valid or authorized without such finding being made by the commission. The validity and approval of any commitments made by the electric or gas distribution company in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter shall be separate and subject to §

39-31-5

. The docket opened pursuant to this subsection shall proceed as follows:

The following state agencies shall provide advisory opinions to the commission on the topics specified below within sixty (60) days from the docketing date:

The department of environmental management (DEM) shall provide an advisory opinion on the expected greenhouse gas emissions and statewide environmental impacts resulting from the proposed project(s), including a determination as to whether the proposed project(s) advance the goals of chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 Act on Climate”).

The commerce corporation shall provide an advisory opinion on the expected statewide economic impacts resulting from the proposed project(s).

The commission shall notify the aforementioned agencies upon the filing of any proposal made under this section, and notify them of any related hearings and/or proceedings.

Advisory opinions issued by agencies designated under subsection (c)(1) of this section shall not be considered as final decisions of the agencies making the opinions and shall not be subject to judicial review under §

42-35-15

or any other provision of the general laws.

Upon completion of the sixty-day (60) advisory-opinion period, the commission shall provide for a thirty-day (30) public comment period on any energy infrastructure project(s) selected pursuant to this chapter and hold evidentiary hearings. In addition to evidentiary hearings, the commission shall also hold at least one public hearing to accept public comment on the proposal(s) prior to an open meeting held pursuant to this section.

The commission shall hold an open meeting no later than one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of filing by the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers and shall certify that the proposed project(s) are in the public interest if, in the commission’s determination, and in consideration of filed advisory opinions and the opinion of the electric or gas distribution utility, the proposed infrastructure project(s):

Are consistent with the findings and purposes of this chapter;

Will benefit Rhode Island by improving local and regional energy system reliability and security;

Will benefit Rhode Island ratepayers by offering the potential for reduced energy price volatility and reduction of energy supply costs in the context of an integrated regional energy system;

Will not cause unacceptable harm to the environment and are consistent with the greenhouse gas reduction goals established in chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 Act on Climate”); and

Will enhance the economic fabric of the state.

The commission shall issue a written determination of its findings within ten (10) business days of its open-meeting decision and provide copies of that determination, along with copies of all advisory opinions, public comment, and any other materials deemed relevant to the commission determination, to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house, the commissioner of the office of energy resources, and the administrator of the division of public utilities and carriers.

A determination issued by the commission shall constitute the sole, final, binding, and determinative regulatory decision within the state for the purpose of authorizing the state to support a proposed, regional energy-infrastructure project(s) that is funded through the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approved tariffs on a regional and/or multistate basis pursuant to this chapter. Appeals shall be governed by §

39-5-1

.

Upon issuance of a written determination by the commission finding that the proposed project(s) is in the public interest, the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers shall, on behalf of the state, be authorized to support any state, regional, and/or multistate process necessary to implement the project(s), including, without limitation, supporting any necessary and related Federal Energy Regulatory Commission filings; provided, however, that any commitments made by the electric or gas distribution company to implement the proposals remain voluntary and subject to §

39-31-5

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the electric or gas distribution company from making a filing under §

39-31-6

, simultaneous with a filing under this section by the office of energy resources and the division of public utilities and carriers, in which case the filings made under §§

39-31-6

and

39-31-7

shall be consolidated.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 477, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 25; P.L. 2022, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 373, § 1.

39-31-8.
Verification of energy generation and attributes of imported electricity.

Energy generation and the attributes of electricity imported into New England shall be tracked and verified through the expansion of the New England Pool — Generation Information System or the development of another appropriate tracking and verification mechanism.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 477, § 1.

39-31-9.
Siting of regional energy infrastructure.

All regional or multistate energy infrastructure projects authorized under this chapter shall respect and maintain compliance with the individual project host state’s siting authority and requirements. Any projects selected pursuant to this chapter must maintain compliance with Rhode Island energy facility siting act requirements, where applicable, as authorized under chapter 98 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 477, § 1.

39-31-10.
Offshore wind procurement.

The electric distribution company is hereby authorized and required to issue a request for proposals for at least six hundred megawatts (600 MW) but no greater than one thousand megawatts (1,000 MW) of newly-developed offshore wind capacity no later than October 15, 2022. The electric distribution company shall develop the request for proposals (RFP) in consultation with the Rhode Island office of energy resources and the Rhode Island division of public utilities and carriers. Review of any proposed contract(s) resulting from this procurement shall be conducted by the commission consistent with the requirements of this chapter. The request for proposals shall require all bidders to provide, at a minimum, information on potential environmental impacts through the submittal of an environmental and fisheries mitigation plan, which shall include site and environmental data transparency requirements; a site layout plan and maps that illustrate the location of all on-shore and offshore equipment and facilities and clearly delineates the perimeter of the area in which offshore wind turbines will be placed; annualized estimates for all economic benefits, including the specific in-state expenditures and employment proposed during the development, construction, and operation and maintenance phases of the project; a diversity, equity, and inclusion plan that, at a minimum, provides the bidder’s proposed strategy to enable access to employment and vendor opportunities for historically marginalized communities; identification of Rhode Island vendors and other domestic offshore wind supply chain opportunities associated with the project; and a plan outlining the bidder’s intentions with respect to the negotiation of a project labor agreement(s) to cover construction activities on a proposed project. This information shall be incorporated in the procurement’s evaluation and scoring criteria.

The electric distribution company, prior to its issuance, shall file the RFP as described in subsection (a) of this section with the commission solely for the purpose of soliciting public comment. The RFP shall be available for thirty (30) days and the commission shall accept written comment throughout that period, and it shall hold one public hearing to accept oral comments. Following the public comment period, the electric distribution company shall issue the RFP with no further action of the commission. Should the electric distribution company subsequently file a contract resulting from the RFP under subsection (c) of this section, or an alternative filing under subsection (d) of this section, it shall provide testimony responding to the public comments either indicating how it was incorporated into the final filing or was not germane to the procurement.

Unless the electric distribution company determines that the bids are unlikely to lead to contracts that comply with all of the requirements of this section and §

39-31-6

, it shall select a project or projects for negotiating a contract that shall be conditioned upon approval by the commission. Negotiations shall proceed in good faith to achieve a commercially reasonable contract that meets the standards set forth in this chapter. Should the distribution company and the selected party agree to a contract, the contract shall be filed with the commission no later than March 15, 2024, for commission approval. The commission shall review the contract and issue an order approving or disapproving the contract within one hundred twenty (120) days of the filing. If the parties are unable to reach agreement on a contract prior to March 15, 2024, an unsigned copy noting which items have mutual agreement and providing each parties’ preferred terms that remain in dispute shall be filed with the commission by the electric distribution company prior to that same date. The commission shall have the authority to evaluate the unsigned contract consistent with the terms of this chapter, rule on any outstanding terms in dispute, and order the electric distribution company to execute the approved contract. In such case of a disputed contract, the commission has the discretion to extend the deadline for approval as needed to complete its review.

If the electric distribution company determines that the bids are unlikely to lead to contracts that meet all of the requirements of this section and §

39-31-6

, it shall submit a filing to the commission together with testimony to explain why it should not be required to negotiate a contract. The commission shall review and rule on the filing within ninety (90) days, which review shall include soliciting input from the agencies required to provide advisory opinions to the commission, and public comment. If the electric distribution company fails to show that the bids are unlikely to lead to a contract that meets all the requirements of this section and §

39-31-6

the commission may order the utility to proceed with negotiations as set forth in subsection (c) of this section.

Long-term contracts shall require that developers of newly developed renewable energy resources will enter into a labor peace agreement with at least one bona fide labor organization either where such bona fide labor organization is actively representing employees providing necessary construction, operations and maintenance services for the newly developed renewable energy resource at the time of such agreement or upon notice by a bona fide labor organization that is attempting to represent employees who will provide necessary operations and maintenance services for the renewable energy system employed in the state. The maintenance of such a labor peace agreement shall be an ongoing material condition of any continuation of payments under the contract.

Developers of newly developed renewable energy resources shall pay each construction, operations and maintenance employees wages and benefits that are not less than the prevailing wage and fringe benefit rates at the journeyman level that are prescribed by the department of labor and training pursuant to chapter 13 of title 37, for the corresponding classification in which the employee is employed, and not less than the prevailing wage rates for employees for which there is no classification prescribed by the department of labor and training; provided that, a worker may be paid wages and benefits not less than the rate applicable to apprentices for the pertinent classification if:

The worker is a participant in an approved apprenticeship program; and

The approved apprenticeship program from which the apprentice is hired maintains a direct entry agreement with a certified pre-apprenticeship training program.

Solicitations by the electric distribution company shall reflect the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 372, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 373, § 3.

39-31-11.
Financial remuneration and incentives.

In order to achieve the purposes of this chapter, electric distribution companies shall be entitled to financial remuneration and incentives for long-term contracts for newly developed renewable energy resources, which are over and above the base rate revenue requirement established in its cost of service for distribution ratemaking. Such remuneration and incentives shall compensate the electric distribution company for accepting the financial obligation of the long-term contracts. For long-term contracts approved pursuant to this chapter on or after January 1, 2022, the financial remuneration and incentives shall be in the form of annual compensation up to one percent (1.0%) of the actual annual payments made under the contracts through December 31, 2026, for those projects that are commercially operating. For long-term contracts approved pursuant to this chapter on or after January 1, 2027, financial remuneration and incentives shall not be applied, unless otherwise granted by the commission. For any calendar year in which the electric distribution company’s actual return on equity exceeds the return on equity allowed by the commission in the electric distribution company’s last general rate case, the commission shall have the authority to adjust any or all remuneration paid to the electric distribution company pursuant to this section in order to assure that such remuneration does not result in or contribute toward the electric distribution company earning above its allowed return for such calendar year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 372, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 373, § 3.

39-31-12.
Bid fees.

Bidders submitting project proposals responsive to any competitive procurements issued pursuant to this chapter may be charged bid fees by the electric distribution company to pay for all reasonable costs of consultants and counsel that may be hired by the Rhode Island office of energy resources, the division of public utilities and carriers, the commerce corporation, and/or the department of environmental management to meet the requirements of this chapter, up to a cap of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per agency. Any bid fees collected by the electric distribution company for purposes of implementing this section must be specified in procurement documents. The electric distribution company shall be required to transfer to each agency any invoiced funds within thirty (30) days of invoice receipt.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 372, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 373, § 3.